California, session 20252026, SB704.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 16525 is added to the Penal Code, to read:16525. (a) As used in Section 33700, “firearm barrel” means the tube, usually metal and cylindrical, through which a projectile or shot charge is fired. A firearm barrel includes any forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, or converted to be used as a firearm barrel, or that is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as a firearm barrel once completed, assembled, or converted. A firearm barrel may have a rifled or smooth bore.(b) A firearm barrel that is attached or affixed to a firearm is not subject to the requirements of Section 33700.SEC. 2. Section 28235 of the Penal Code is amended to read:28235. Except as otherwise provided in Section 28233, moneys received by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund, which is hereby created, to be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the department to offset the costs incurred pursuant to any of the following:(a) This article.(b) Section 18910.(c) Section 27555.(d) Subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 27560.(e) Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 28010).(f) Article 6 (commencing with Section 28450).(g) Section 31110.(h) Section 31115.(i) Subdivision (a) of Section 32020.(j) Section 32670.(k) Section 33320.(l) Section 33700.SEC. 3. Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 33700) is added to Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, to read: CHAPTER 11. Firearm Barrel33700. (a) (1) A firearm barrel, as defined in Section 16525, shall not be sold or transferred unless that transaction is completed in person by a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.(2) Commencing July 1, 2027, a firearm barrel, as defined in Section 16525, shall not be sold or transferred unless that transaction is completed in person by a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and the licensed firearms dealer has conducted an eligibility check to determine if that the person is authorized to purchase a firearm barrel under subdivision (b) in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice.(3) No person shall possess with the intent to sell or offer to sell a firearm barrel in violation of this section.(b) A person is authorized to purchase or otherwise acquire a firearm barrel if they meet the following criteria:(1) They are at least 18 years of age.(2) They are not prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm under state or federal law.(c) Commencing July 1, 2027, the licensed firearms dealer shall legibly record all of the following on a form to be prescribed by the department pertaining to the sale or transfer of the firearm barrel:(1) The date of the sale or transfer.(2) The purchaser’s or transferee’s driver’s license or other identification number and the state in which it was issued.(3) The make, model, and caliber of the firearm that the firearm barrel is designed for or used in.(4) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full name.(5) The name of the salesperson who processed the sale or transfer.(6) The purchaser’s or transferee’s full residential address and telephone number.(7) The purchaser’s or transferee’s date of birth.(d) Commencing July 1, 2027, a licensed firearms dealer shall electronically submit to the department the information required by subdivision (c) for all sales and transfers of ownership of a firearm barrel.(e) The department is authorized to adopt regulations to implement this act.(f) (1) A first violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.(2) A second violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable as a misdemeanor by up to one year in jail and a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).(3) A third violation of subdivision (a), and any subsequent violation thereafter of subdivision (a), shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.(g) The following are exempt from the process outlined in this section:(1) Sales or transfers to federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies.(2) Sales or transfers to a federal firearms licensee.(3) Sales or transfers to the United States military.(4) Sales or transfers to a person who, in the same transaction, is separately purchasing a firearm and undergoing a state and federal firearm eligibility check pursuant to Section 28220.(5) Sales or transfers to a federally licensed collector who is acquiring or being loaned the barrel of a firearm that is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, who has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the department pursuant to Section 26710.(6) Transfers to or from the public administrator, public guardian, public conservator, the executor, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or administrator of an estate. Any transfers or sales from these persons to any third party other than law enforcement or a licensed firearms dealer shall be conducted by a licensed firearms dealer and is subject to the requirements of this section.(7) A barrel that is attached to or affixed to a firearm.(8) The sale or other transfer of ownership of a firearm barrel if the sale or other transfer of ownership is to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, and the entity is acquiring the firearm barrel as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals. All such barrels shall be disposed of pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005.(h) The department is authorized to adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.(i) The department shall require the licensed firearms dealer to charge each firearm barrel purchaser or transferee a fee of up to 5 dollars ($5) to conduct the eligibility check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), but shall not to exceed the department’s actual processing costs. The fee may be increased each year by an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1) as necessary to reimburse the department for costs to conduct the eligibility check.SEC. 4. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.